Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB99.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Altered originating school district" or "altered originating district" means the
originating school district as it exists after a new independent school district is
removed from its boundaries and that shall continue as the same legal entity as
the originating school district;
(2) "Interim school board" or "interim board" means the local board of education
of the new independent school district that is elected under to Section 2 of this Act
or any successor board elected, either of which are serving prior to the deadline
to be fully operational established in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of this Act;
(3) "New independent school district" or "new independent district" means an
independent school district that is created under Section 2 of this Act;
(4) "Originating school district" or "originating district" means a school district
from which a new independent school district and an altered originating school
district is created under Section 2 of this Act; and
(5) "Qualifying city" means an incorporated city:
(a) That has no independent school district currently in existence within the
city's boundaries;
(b) With boundaries that do not contain the entirety of the county in which the
city is located; and
(c) That has a population based on the most recent decennial census conducted
by the United States Bureau of the Census of at least five thousand (5,000)
people.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The qualified voters of a qualifying city may petition to require an election on
establishing a new independent school district within the boundaries of the
qualifying city.
(2) A petition for an election establishing a new independent district shall be signed
by the number of constitutionally qualified voters of the qualifying city equal to
twenty-five percent (25%) of the votes cast in the city at the last preceding regular
election. The petition may consist of one (1) or more separate units, and shall be
filed with the county clerk. The petition shall be in accordance with the
following:
(a) Before a petition for an election may be presented for signatures, an intent
to circulate the petition, including a copy of the unsigned petition, shall be
filed with the county clerk by any person or group of persons seeking the
establishment of a new independent district;
(b) After a petition for an election has received no fewer than the number of
qualifying signatures required by this subsection, the signed petition shall
be filed with the county clerk;
(c) A petition for an election shall include, in addition to the signature and
legibly printed name of each voter, the voter's residence address, year of
birth, and the correct date upon which the voter's name was signed;
(d) No signer of a petition for an election may withdraw his or her name or
have it taken from the petition after the petition has been filed. If the name
of any person has been placed on the petition for an election without that
person's authority, the person may appear before the county clerk before
the election is ordered and upon proof that the person's name was placed on
the petition without his or her authority, the person's name and personal
information shall be eliminated by the county clerk. When the person's
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
name and personal information has been eliminated, he or she shall not be
counted as a petitioner;
(e) A petition for an election under this subsection shall state:
1. "We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election
on the following question: 'Are you in favor of the establishment of a
new independent school district in (name of city) to serve the residents
of the city and be governed by an elected local board of education with
authority to tax for educational purposes?'"; and
2. The projected date of the election;
(f) No petition for an election shall be circulated for more than six (6) months
prior to its filing;
(g) Substantial compliance with the wording designated under this subsection
for the petition is sufficient to validate the actual wording of the petition;
and
(h) In order for the election to be held on the day fixed by law for a regular
election, the petition shall be filed not later than the first Tuesday following
the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed by law for holding the
regular election.
(3) After a petition for an election has been filed in conformity with this section, the
county clerk shall direct that the questions in subsection (8)(a) and (b)1. of this
section shall be placed on the ballot for the next regular election to be held in that
city.
(4) (a) Upon the determination by the county clerk that a petition for an election
has satisfied the requirements of this section, the county clerk shall begin to
accept petitions for nomination for the provisional election of members of
the interim board of education that would be established upon the creation
of the new independent school district as provided in subsection (8) of this
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
section.
(b) The eligibility requirements, number of board members, and election
requirements applied to other independent school districts under this
chapter shall apply to the provisional election of an interim board as though
the proposed new independent district were already in existence.
(5) The general election laws, including penalties for violations, shall apply to the
election for the proposed new independent district and the provisional election of
an interim board of the proposed new independent district required in this
section, except where these laws are inconsistent with this section.
(6) No election to establish a new independent district under this section shall be held
in the same city more than once every three (3) years.
(7) No later than the fourth Tuesday preceding an election at which the proposition
under this section is to be submitted to the voters, any committee that in good
faith advocates or opposes the establishment of the new independent district may
file a petition with the county clerk asking that the petitioners be recognized as
the committee entitled to nominate challengers for the question in subsection
(8)(a) of this section to serve at the election at which the proposition is to be voted
on. The requirements and procedures regarding challengers under this
subsection shall be the same as provided in KRS 117.315(4), (5), and (6), 117.316,
117.317, and 117.318.
(8) The proposition under this section shall submit two (2) questions to the voters of
the city as follows:
(a) The first question shall be on the establishment of the new independent
school district. The question to be voted upon shall be stated without
emblems and voters shall designate a "Yes" or a "No" vote. The form of the
question shall be: "Are you in favor of the establishment of a new
independent school district in (name of city) to serve the residents of the city
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
and be governed by an elected local board of education with authority to
raise taxes for educational purposes?"; and
(b) The second question shall be on the provisional membership of the interim
board of education of the new independent district and shall be subject to
the following:
1. The form of the question for the provisional election of the interim
board members shall be: "If a new independent school district is
established, who should serve as the members of the interim board of
education for the district?";
2. The five (5) candidates receiving the most votes shall be provisionally
elected to the board, dependent on subparagraph 3. of this paragraph;
and
3. If the majority of votes cast in the election on establishing a new
independent district under paragraph (a) of this subsection are:
a. "No," then the provisional election of the members of the
interim board of education shall be void; or
b. "Yes," then the provisional election of the members of the
interim board of education shall be binding and the board shall
serve as an interim board.
(9) The ballot containing an election establishing a new independent school district
and a provisional election of an interim board of education for the proposed new
independent school district shall have the question of the establishment of the
new independent district appear on the ballot before the provisional election of an
interim board of education. The two (2) questions shall appear on the ballot in
proximity to each other.
(10) The results of the election shall be certified by the county board of elections. The
certificate of the result shall be immediately filed with the county clerk and the
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
certificate, or an attested copy thereof, shall be prima facie evidence of the result
of the election.
(11) The questions in subsection (8) of this section shall be subject to the same
recount, contest, canvass, and recanvass provisions and procedures as set forth in
KRS 242.120.
(12) (a) Any members elected under subsection (8)(b) of this section shall assume
office upon certification of the election results and serve on the interim
board until January 1 following the next regular election in an even year.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 160.200, upon the end of the term of any members
elected under subsection (8)(b) of this section, as set out in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the three (3) members elected during the regular election in
an even year with the most votes shall then take office and serve four (4)
year terms. The remaining members elected during that election shall serve
an initial two (2) year term, with subsequent terms being for four (4) years.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon the certification of an election result that creates a new independent school
district and establishes the district's interim board of education under Section 2
of this Act, the interim board shall have all the powers, authority, and
responsibilities of any other local board of education, except for the transitional
provisions provided in this section and Sections 4, 5, and 6 of this Act. Any
vacancy in membership of an interim board shall be filled in the same manner as
KRS 160.190.
(2) The board of education of the originating district shall continue serving as the
board of education of the altered originating district. The board of education of
the altered originating district shall conduct the process for dividing the district
into new election divisions under KRS 160.210. In dividing the altered originating
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
district, if more than one (1) of its members reside in one (1) division, or if any of
its members reside in the new independent district, then representation of over-
and under-represented divisions shall be determined by lot and the selected
members shall represent those divisions until their terms expire. Thereafter,
members from those divisions shall be nominated and elected as provided in KRS
160.200, 160.220, 160.230, 160.240, 160.250, and 160.260.
(3) Upon the certification of an election result that creates a new independent district
and establishes the district's interim board under Section 2 of this Act, the
Kentucky Department of Education shall conduct a calculation of the total assets
and liabilities held by the originating district from which the territory of the new
independent district was established based on the election date the new
independent district. The calculation shall comply with the following:
(a) The calculation shall be an amount in dollars for both total assets and total
liabilities;
(b) The department shall develop a list of assets and liabilities and the values
assigned to each. Classes of individual items may collectively be given an
assigned value based on an average valuation. The list shall be governed by
the following:
1. The assets shall exclude:
a. Any federal funds or grant funds given to the originating district
when division would violate restrictions or conditions of the
funds; and
b. Any property purchased with funds when division would violate
restrictions or condition of the funds or the property; and
2. The liabilities shall include all the debt service of the originating
district, including debt for construction and the purchase of
equipment for the originating district; and
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
(c) The department shall then calculate the projected tax assessments for both
the new independent district and the altered originating district. Based on
the proportion of the new independent district's and altered originating
district's projected tax assessments to the originating district's overall tax
assessments, the department shall assign an amount in dollars of both
assets and liabilities. These shall be the initial assigned value of assets and
liabilities for each district;
(4) Until the transfer of assets and liabilities outlined in subsection (10) of this
section, and excluding any required funds transferred in Section 4 of this Act, the
altered originating district shall maintain control and use of the new independent
district's assets and shall be responsible for their maintenance. An amount of
assets assigned to the new independent district in subsection (5) of this section
shall be restricted and shall only be used, disposed of, or expended to provide
essential education services for currently enrolled students. The altered
originating district's use of any new independent district funds shall require
approval of the department. Any new debt acquired by the altered originating
district shall not be assigned to the new independent district.
(5) Prior to the deadline for the new independent district to be fully operational
established in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of this Act, as the altered originating
district continues to make any payments on debts of the originating district, the
amounts shall be attributed in the same proportional manner as in subsection
(3)(c) of this section.
(6) The interim board of education of the new independent district and the board of
education of the altered originating district shall conduct negotiations to agree to
the division of the originating district's assets and liabilities. Each district shall be
entitled to an amount of assets assigned by the department under subsection (3)
of this section. The negotiation shall resolve:
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
(a) The disposition of any of the originating district's real property that is
located within the boundaries of the new independent district;
(b) The division of any liquid assets, accounts receivable, and intangible assets
of the originating district;
(c) The specific liabilities each district shall receive individually or shall share
between the districts;
(d) The division, in bulk or individually, of the originating district's desks,
books, computers, projectors, televisions, phones, school buses,
automobiles, furniture, equipment, supplies, and other tangible personal
property owned by the originating school district; and
(e) The continuation, modification, assignment, or termination of
nonemployment contracts agreed to by the originating district.
(7) The boards of education shall conclude negotiations and enter an agreed division
of the originating district's assets and liabilities by November 1 following the
establishing of the new independent district. The agreement may provide a
timeline for the general transfer of assets and liabilities and may also provide for
a timeline for the transfer of specific assets. If any matter remains unresolved
after the deadline established in this subsection, the matters shall be presented to
the commissioner of education or designee for resolution pursuant to subsection
(8) of this section. Any proposed agreement to the division of the originating
district's assets shall be agreed to by a majority vote of each district's board of
education.
(8) On issues the boards cannot come to agreement under subsection (6) or (7) of
this section, a board may appeal to the commissioner of education or designee to
determine an equitable resolution of the disagreement. In any determination, the
decision shall prioritize the successful operation of both districts. The matter
shall be decided within thirty (30) days of the submission. The commissioner or
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
designee shall notify the districts of the decision. The decisions may be appealed
to the Kentucky Board of Education at its next regular meeting.
(9) If any disagreement between the boards remains unresolved after the passage of
the deadlines in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, the Kentucky Department
of Education shall assess a fine to the districts in the amount of the dispute in
question with the fine divided proportionally in the same manner as in subsection
(3)(c) of this section and shall be placed in the fund to support education
excellence in Kentucky.
(10) By the second June 30 following the establishment of the new independent
district, the transfer of all assets and debts identified in the agreement made
under subsection (7) of this section or resolved under subsection (6) of this
section shall be determined and completed.
(11) The altered originating district shall continue to exercise taxing authority over
both the altered originating district and the new independent district and shall
collect revenues in the same manner as the originating district. For the tax year
in which the deadline to be fully operational established in subsection (4)(h) of
Section 4 of this Act occurs, the amounts collected by the altered originating
district shall first be divided by two (2). The quotient shall then be distributed
proportionally between the two districts in the same manner as in subsection
(3)(c) of this section. Upon the close of that tax year, the new independent district
shall be responsible for collecting the taxes within the boundaries of the district
as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) When a new independent school district is established under Section 2 of this Act,
the mayor of the qualifying city in which it is established shall call the interim
board to meet within ten (10) days.
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
(2) At the first meeting, the interim board shall only:
(a) Take the oath of office;
(b) Elect a chair and vice chair;
(c) Discuss potential policies of the interim board;
(d) Discuss the appointment of a superintendent, secretary, and treasurer under
this chapter; and
(e) Determine whether the board shall seek assistance from the commissioner
of education pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(3) An interim board may request technical assistance from the Kentucky
Department of Education by submitting a request to the commissioner of
education. Upon receiving a request, the commissioner shall direct department
staff to provide technical assistance to the board in developing the transition
required under subsection (4) of this section.
(4) In transitioning the new independent district into a fully functional district, the
interim board and new independent district shall conform with the following:
(a) Develop, adopt, maintain, and comply with the transition plan required
under Section 6 of this Act;
(b) By January 1 after its establishment, develop an interim budget for the
operations of the new independent district for the remainder of the fiscal
year that will only include the costs of critical operations of the interim
board, such as salaries, supplies, offices, and other expenses necessary for
the interim board to function. The chair of the interim board shall submit
the interim budget to the commissioner of education for approval. Within
five (5) days, the commissioner shall approve or disapprove the proposed
budget. If the proposed budget is disapproved, the interim board may
resubmit an amended budget or appeal the commissioner's decision to the
Kentucky Board of Education at its next regular meeting. Once a budget
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
has been approved, the department shall require the altered originating
district to transfer the approved amounts to the new independent district in
regular installments. If the altered originating district fails to transfer the
funds, the amounts shall be deducted from the funds transferred to the
altered originating district from the fund to support education excellence in
Kentucky. These amounts shall be deducted from the new independent
district's assets assigned in subsection (3) of Section 3 of this Act;
(c) In a timely manner, the interim board shall:
1. Appoint an interim superintendent for the new independent district to
assist the interim board in executing the transition. Any contract
between an interim superintendent and an interim board shall not
extend past the deadline for the new independent district to be fully
operational established in paragraph (h) of this subsection, but may
subsequently be renewed by the board;
2. Appoint a secretary and a treasurer for the interim board; and
3. Select counsel for the interim board;
(d) Upon the direction of the interim board, the interim superintendent shall
hire district staff critical for the operations of the interim board, including
but not limited to a district finance officer. Notwithstanding any statute to
the contrary, any hiring or termination made by the interim superintendent
prior to the deadline established in paragraph (h) of this subsection shall be
subject to ratification by the interim board;
(e) By May 1 following the establishment of the new independent district, the
interim board shall develop a budget for the operations of the district for the
following fiscal year. The chair of the interim board shall submit the budget
to the commissioner of education for approval. The budget under this
paragraph shall be subject to the same provisions as the interim budget in
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
paragraph (b) of this subsection but shall include additional district staff
required for the continued development of district operations;
(f) By the second January 1 following the establishment of the new
independent district, the interim board shall:
1. Identify one (1) or more schools that the interim board intends to
establish within the district at the start of the next school year, the
grades and programs to be operated within those schools, and the
number of staff and the staff positions that will be placed at those
schools; and
2. Develop a special budget designed to build up the district's operations
necessary to provide a minimum school term as defined in KRS
158.070 during the following school year. The budget under this
subparagraph shall be subject to the same provisions as the interim
budget in paragraph (b) of this subsection but shall include funds
needed prior to the beginning of the next school year for:
a. The hiring of principals and other school staff required for
preparations;
b. District and school facilities and additional supplies or tangible
personal property not provided for in the agreement in
subsection (6) of Section 3 of this Act; and
c. Contract services that are needed to support district and school
operations;
(g) Notwithstanding KRS 160.345, upon the authorization by the interim board:
1. The interim superintendent shall select and hire the principals for the
district's schools, subject to the ratification of the interim board; and
2. The principals shall begin hiring school staff for the following school
year, with the hiring subject to the ratification of the interim
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
superintendent; and
(h) The second July 1 following the establishment of the new independent
school district shall be the deadline for the district to be fully operational
and the interim board shall ensure the district is prepared to provide full
services to the students of the district for the coming school year.
(5) An interim board of a new independent district may request a waiver of the
timeline established in subsection (4) of this section to the commissioner of
education or designee, except that no waiver shall be granted to alter the deadline
established in subsection (4)(h) of this section. The commissioner or designee
shall approve or deny the request within five (5) days of the submission. A denial
may be appealed to the Kentucky Board of Education at its next regular meeting.
(6) If during the transition established under this section the interim board identifies
a statute or administrative regulation that inhibits the district's ability to be fully
operational as required under subsection (4)(h) of this section, the interim board
may submit a request to the Kentucky Board of Education to temporarily waive
the statute or administrative regulation. The request shall identify the specific
statute or administrative regulation, the rationale for the needed waiver, and the
duration the waiver is needed. The Kentucky Board of Education shall consider
the request at its next regular meeting and, if approved, the state board shall
identify the duration of the waiver that shall not extend past the conclusion of the
first fully operational school year.
(7) The interim board may enter into a contract with another board of education to
provide support services for the new independent district, including financial
management and payroll services. The contract shall not extend beyond the
deadline established in subsection (4)(h) of this section. However, the contract
may subsequently be renewed by the board.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, if, prior to the
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
deadline established in subsection (4)(h) of this section, the interim board
determines by a four-fifths (4/5) vote that the establishment of the new
independent district is not financially viable, then the chair of the interim board
shall submit notice of the vote to the board of education of the altered originating
district and the commissioner of education. The commissioner shall establish the
timeline and the process for the new independent district and interim board to
cease functions and merge back into the originating school district.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon the deadline to become fully functional in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of
this Act, the new independent district shall be prepared to provide services to the
students of the district and the interim board shall no longer serve as an interim
but shall exercise the full authorities of a local board of education, except for the
provisions of this section and Section 6 of this Act.
(2) For any debts assessed to the new independent district under Section 3 of this Act,
any tax levied by the originating district that was authorized for the purposes of
paying a specific debt or interest shall continue to be levied and collected within
the boundaries of the new independent district by the new independent district's
board in accordance with the laws under which the levies were originally made
until all the associated obligations of the originating district have been retired.
(3) Notwithstanding the requirements under KRS 160.345, the new independent
district shall not be required to implement school-based decision making in the
district for the first fully operational school year, but shall adopt a process to seek
the feedback of parents and school faculty during that year. The district shall be
subject to KRS 160.345 with the start of the second fully operational year.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
(1) The interim board shall develop, adopt, maintain, and comply with a transition
plan for the new independent district that shall guide the transition process for
the new independent district until the close of the first fully operational school
year.
(2) The interim board may request assistance in developing and maintaining the
transition plan from the commissioner of education who shall provide expertise
and guidance from the Kentucky Department of Education for the interim
board's plan.
(3) The transition plan shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The aspects required in subsection (4) of Section 4 of this Act;
(b) An assessment detailing the new independent district's number of school-
aged residents and projections for the first fully operational school year's
total enrollment and enrollment by grade and program;
(c) The schools, grades, and programs the district will offer;
(d) The facilities that the district will maintain to house those schools, grades,
and programs that includes a facilities plan for the first fully operational
year;
(e) The transportation services the district will provide to students that includes
a transportation plan for the first fully operational year;
(f) The food services the district will provide to students that includes a food
services plan for the first fully operational year;
(g) The process the district will follow in conforming to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act, and the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973;
(h) The staffing plan for the district that includes teacher and staff assignments
to specific schools for the first fully operational year;
(i) The procedures and advisory bodies established to seek parent and school
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
faculty feedback during the first fully operational year as required under
Section 5 of this Act;
(j) Notwithstanding the requirements in KRS 158.070 for a school district
calendar committee, establish the school calendar for the first fully
operational school year;
(k) A district technology plan that provides for the technological needs of the
district and schools throughout the transition and the first fully operational
school year;
(l) Transition services for high school students to ensure that students remain
on track to graduate during the transition and the first fully operational
school year; and
(m) During the first fully operational school year, whether and how the new
independent district will offer the following:
1. Preschool and kindergarten;
2. Career and technical education;
3. Student health services; and
4. Family resource and youth service centers.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "altered originating school district" and "new
independent school district" have the same meanings as in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, when a new
independent school district is created under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, the
calculation of the funds from the fund to support education excellence in
Kentucky that are due to both the new independent school district and the altered
originating school district for the first fully operational school year shall:
(a) For purposes of average daily attendance, be based on both districts'
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1241
projected enrollment and the originating district's average daily attendance
from the prior school year; and
(b) For purposes of aggregate daily attendance of students transported, be
based on both districts' projected enrollment and a transportation plan
submitted to the Kentucky Department of Education by both districts.
(3) The calculations required in subsection (2) of this section shall be adjusted by the
Kentucky Department of Education in January of the first fully operational
school year to reflect the first semester's actual data.
(4) Following the first fully operational school year, funding for subsequent years of
operation shall be calculated as otherwise provided in this chapter.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 12/31/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed